New Jersey, session 222, A1333.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that transmits and distributes electricity to end users within the State. Extraordinary circumstances means a sudden, large-scale non-recurring event that significantly disrupts the operations of an electric public utilitys or gas public utilitys normal operations and ability to provide services in the State.  Extraordinary circumstances include, but are not limited to, major natural disasters like a hurricane, severe earthquake, widespread flooding, or an unexpected power grid failure impacting a large area, causing widespread outages and requiring immediate, extensive response efforts beyond typical maintenance or repairs. Extraordinary circumstances include disasters or emergencies declared at the State or federal level. Gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within this State. b.    An electric public utility or gas public utility shall not increase its rates for residential customers in excess of five percent during any one-year period, unless required by extraordinary circumstances. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.